North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-04 The Fund and Premium Payments Thereto

65-04-01.
Classification of employments — Premium rates — Requirements.

The organization shall classify employments with respect to their degrees of hazard, determine the risks of different classifications, and fix the rate of premium for each of the classifications sufficiently high to provide for:

The payment of the expenses of administration of the organization;

The payment of compensation according to the provisions and schedules contained in this title; and

The maintenance by the fund of adequate reserves and surplus to the end that it may be kept at all times in an entirely solvent condition.

In the exercise of the powers and discretion conferred upon it, the organization shall fix and maintain for each class of occupation, the lowest rate which still will enable it to comply with the other provisions of this section.

The organization shall establish premium rates annually on an actuarial basis. The statewide average premium rate level may not deviate by more than five percentage points from the recommended actuarial indicated premium level for that year.

Before the effective date of any premium rate change, including a change in the minimum premium, the organization shall hold a public hearing on the rate change. Chapter 28-32 does not apply to a hearing held by the organization under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0401; S.L. 1995, ch. 617, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 604, § 2; 2009, ch. 618, § 1.

65-04-02.
Reserves — Surplus.

The organization shall maintain adequate financial reserves to ensure the solvency of the fund and the payment of future benefit obligations, based upon actuarially sound principles. The discount rate used in evaluating the financial reserves may not exceed six percent. The level of financial reserves plus available surplus determined as of June thirtieth of each year must be at least one hundred twenty percent but may not exceed one hundred forty percent of the actuarially established discounted reserve.

If the level of financial reserves plus available surplus determined as of June thirtieth of any year is below one hundred twenty percent of the actuarially established discounted reserve, the organization may not issue premium dividends and, notwithstanding section 65-04-01, the organization shall modify recommended premium rate levels so that the organization is estimated to come into compliance within the following two years.

If the level of financial reserves plus available surplus determined as of June thirtieth of any year is above one hundred forty percent of the actuarially established discounted reserve, the organization shall issue premium dividends in a fiscally prudent manner so that the organization is estimated to come into compliance with the requirements of subsection 1 within the following two years. However, premium dividends issued may not exceed fifty percent of the preceding year’s premium in any given year.

If the level of financial reserves plus available surplus determined as of June thirtieth of any year is between one hundred twenty percent and one hundred thirty percent of the actuarially established discounted reserve, the organization may not issue premium dividends.

If the level of financial reserves plus available surplus determined as of June thirtieth of any year is one hundred thirty percent to one hundred forty percent of the actuarially established discounted reserve, the organization may issue premium dividends. However, premium dividends issued may not exceed forty percent of the preceding year’s premium in any given year, and the level of financial reserves plus available surplus may not be reduced below one hundred thirty percent.

For the purposes of this section, “available surplus” means net assets as stated on the statement of net assets of the organization, but does not include funds designated or obligated to specific programs or projects pursuant to a directive or specific approval by the legislative assembly.

The independent annual financial audit of the organization must report the organization’s financial reserves.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; 1943, ch. 274, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 65-0402; S.L. 1989, ch. 69, § 78; 1999, ch. 230, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 605, § 1; 2009, ch. 614, § 2.

65-04-03.
Accounts to be kept for classifications and employers.

The organization shall keep an accurate account of the moneys paid in premiums by each of the several classes of occupations or industries and of the disbursements on account of injuries to and deaths of employees thereof, and it also shall keep an account of the moneys received from each individual employer and of the amount disbursed from the fund on account of injuries to and deaths of employees of each employer.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0403; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-03.1.
State entities account — Continuing appropriation.

The organization shall establish a single workforce safety and insurance account for state entities covered by chapter 32-12.2. The organization shall use the combined payroll, premium, and loss history of selected agencies to determine future experience rates, dividends, assessments, and premiums. Classifications and premium rates must be based on the hazards and risks of the different occupations covered by this account. The payroll reporting period for this account is for a fiscal year of July first through June thirtieth. The office of management and budget shall furnish combined payroll information to the organization in a format prescribed by the organization.

Workforce safety and insurance premiums from state entities covered by chapter 32-12.2 must be deposited in the risk management workers’ compensation fund. The state investment board shall invest this fund in accordance with chapter 21-10. Funds received as contributions from state entities, all other payments deposited in this fund, and interest and income received on investments are appropriated on a continuing basis for the purposes of this fund. The purposes of this fund are to pay workforce safety and insurance premiums for state agencies, workforce safety and insurance claims costs not covered by the deductible contract, and costs associated with workers’ compensation loss control programs. The risk management division of the office of management and budget shall administer this fund. Section 54-44.1-11 does not apply to this fund.

A state entity covered by chapter 32-12.2 shall participate in the risk management workforce safety and insurance program unless exempted by the director of the office of management and budget.

The risk management division of the office of management and budget shall administer the account’s internal workforce safety and insurance return-to-work program. Every state entity is required to participate in the return-to-work program. The program may include assigning employees to agencies other than the agency for which the employee worked on the date of the injury.

The office of management and budget may adopt rules to administer the risk management workforce safety and insurance program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 15, § 29; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 2; 2007, ch. 568, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2013, ch. 501, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 98 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

65-04-04.
Employers obligated to pay premiums and assessments — Certificate provided.

Each employer subject to this title shall pay into the fund the amount of premium and assessment determined by the organization. The amount must be determined by the classifications, rules, and rates made and published by the organization and must be based on a proportion of the annual expenditure of money by the employer for the service of persons subject to the provisions of this title.

The organization shall provide to the employer a certificate specifying that the payment has been made. The certificate, is prima facie evidence of the payment of the premium.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 65-04-15, the certificate may reflect the employer has paid the minimum due and has no employees for the period indicated on the certificate. If an employer defaults on premium or assessment payments after a certificate has been issued, the organization may revoke that employer’s certificate.

The organization shall provide that premiums or assessments payable by school districts, multidistrict special education units, area career and technology centers, and regional education associations, townships, and all public corporations or agencies, except municipal corporations, fall due at the end of the fiscal year of that entity, and that premiums or assessments payable by all municipal corporations fall due at the end of the calendar year, and may make provisions so that premiums or assessments of other employers fall due on different or specified dates.

For the purpose of effectuating different or specified due dates, the organization may carry new or current risks for a period of less than one year and not to exceed eighteen months, either by request of the employer or action of the organization.

An employer subject to this chapter shall display in a conspicuous manner at the workplace and in a sufficient number of places to reasonably inform employees of the fact, a certificate showing compliance with this chapter and the toll-free telephone number used to report unsafe working conditions and actual or suspected workforce safety and insurance fraud.

Any employer subject to this chapter is liable to pay a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for failure to display the notice of compliance and the toll-free telephone number as required by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, §§ 6, 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 396a6, 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0404; S.L. 1945, ch. 338, § 1; 1951, ch. 344, § 2; 1953, ch. 352, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 65-0404; S.L. 1961, ch. 389, § 1; 1963, ch. 425, § 1; 1991, ch. 716, § 1; 1993, ch. 614, § 8; 2001, ch. 578, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 3; 2007, ch. 569, § 1; 2009, ch. 163, § 5; 2019, ch. 524, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

65-04-04.1.
Determination of weekly wage for premium purposes to veteran-on-the-job trainee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 538, § 1.

65-04-04.2.
Basis of calculating premiums.

For each year, the amount of an employee’s wages subject to premium calculations must be determined as an amount equal to seventy percent of the statewide average annual wage, hereafter referred to as limited payroll, rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars, determined by the organization on or before July first as calculated by job service North Dakota under subsection 3 of section 52-04-03.

The rates for each classification must be determined by:

Estimating the revenue needed by each employment classification;

Estimating the total limited payroll to be reported by all employers in each employment classification for the year; and

Dividing the estimated revenue needed by an employment classification by the estimated total limited payroll in that classification to determine the required average premium for that classification rate.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 716, § 2; 1993, ch. 622, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-04.3.
Employer relief for third-party recovery.

The organization, upon recovery of its subrogation interest after a third-party lawsuit under section 65-01-09, shall give relief to the employer from the date of injury for the amount of the recovery up to the actual amount expended on a claim charged against the employer’s account. For purposes of this section, “relief” means the amount of money recovered by the organization in a third-party action will be deducted from the amount charged against the employer’s experience rating.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 618, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-04.4.
Medical expense assessments.

The employer shall reimburse the organization for all medical expenses related to a compensable injury to an employee if the expenses do not exceed two hundred fifty dollars and shall reimburse the organization for the first two hundred fifty dollars of medical expenses when the expenses exceed two hundred fifty dollars. If a claim for benefits is filed with the organization by midnight central time on the first business day following the workplace injury, the organization shall pay the first two hundred fifty dollars of medical expenses. A claim is filed by submitting a form furnished by the organization or by another method designated by the organization. If a claim for benefits is filed with the organization more than fourteen days from the date the employer received notice of the workplace injury from the employee, the employer shall reimburse the organization for the first three hundred fifty dollars of medical expenses if the expenses exceed three hundred fifty dollars. If the organization determines the claim is compensable, the organization shall pay the medical expenses associated with the claim and notify the employer of payments to be made by the employer under this section. If the employer does not pay the organization within thirty days of notice by the organization, the organization may impose a penalty on that employer. The penalty may not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the payment owed by the employer. The organization shall collect the penalty in a civil action against the employer and deposit the money in the fund. An employer may not directly or indirectly charge an injured employee for any payment the employer makes on a claim. Except as otherwise provided, if the cost of an injured employee’s medical treatment exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, the organization shall pay all further medical expenses. This section is effective for all compensable injuries that occur after July 31, 1995. This section does not apply to compensable injuries paid under sections 65-06.2-04 and 65-06.2-08.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 437, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

65-04-04.5.
Settlement in discretion of organization.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the organization may settle an amount owed by an employer to resolve a disputed issue at any time and on its own motion or by application of an employer.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 503, § 7, effective March 15, 2021.

65-04-05.
Employer to furnish payroll information to organization — Determination of status — Report of actual and estimated payrolls. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 17.

65-04-05.1.
Sections 65-04-04 and 65-04-05 retroactive. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 344, § 11.

65-04-06.
Employer obligated to file payroll reports — Organization to specify method of providing information — Verification may be required.

Each employer subject to this title shall provide at least annually a payroll report to the organization. The organization may require an employer to file a payroll report with the organization more frequently during the premium year.

Each employer required to file a payroll report must file the report by an electronic method approved by the organization. An employer that does not comply with the requirements to file the payroll report electronically is deemed to have failed to submit the payroll report. If an employer is unable to provide the information required, the employer shall submit to the organization in writing the reason. The organization and its representatives may require any employer to submit information under oath.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 5; 1921, ch. 143, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a5; S.L. 1939, ch. 251, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0406; S.L. 1983, ch. 696, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2019, ch. 524, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

65-04-07.
County superintendents of schools to report school district clerks to organization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 176, § 2.

65-04-08.
County auditors to report auditors and clerks to organization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 538, § 1.

65-04-09.
All public contracts involving labor to be reported to organization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 538, § 1.

65-04-10.
Provision relating to workforce safety and insurance required in contractor’s bonds.

There must be inserted in every bond given by a contractor doing work for the state of North Dakota or for any political subdivision thereof, in addition to the general provisions for the faithful and complete performance of all work required under the contract, this further provision: That the contractor has made, or will make, prior to the commencement of any work by the contractor or any subcontractor under the contract, full and true report to the organization of the payroll expenditures for the employees to be engaged in the work, and that the contractor has paid, or will pay, the premium thereon prior to the commencement of the work.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 96, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a30; R.C. 1943, § 65-0410; S.L. 1993, ch. 613, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-11.
Organization may make examinations under oath to secure payroll information.

The director, the organization, or any person employed by the organization for that purpose may examine under oath any employer, or any officer, agent, or employee of any employer, for the purpose of ascertaining any information which the employer is required under this title to furnish to the organization.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 5; 1921, ch. 143, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a5; S.L. 1939, ch. 251, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0411; S.L. 1989, ch. 295, § 12; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-12.
Penalties for failure to obtain coverage or to make payroll reports — How collected — Disposition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 17.

65-04-13.
Books, records, and payrolls of employers subject to audit and inspection — Penalty for refusal to permit inspection.

All books, records, and payrolls of the employers of the state, showing or reflecting in any way upon the amount of wage expenditure of the employers, are open always for inspection by the organization or any of its traveling auditors, inspectors, or assistants for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of the reports, wage expenditures, the number of employees, and any other information necessary for the organization to administer this title. An employer who refuses to submit the employer’s books, records, and payrolls for inspection by the organization, or its auditor, inspector, or assistant presenting written authority from the organization, is subject to a penalty of five hundred dollars for each offense. The organization shall collect the penalty by civil action in the name of the state and shall deposit a penalty collected under this section to the credit of the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 5; 1921, ch. 143, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a5; R.C. 1943, § 65-0413; S.L. 1989, ch. 295, § 13; 1991, ch. 714, § 34; 1995, ch. 619, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-14.
False payroll report — Liability of employer — Collection and disposition of penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 17.

65-04-15.
Information in employer’s files confidential — Exceptions — Penalty if employee of organization divulges information.

The information contained in an employer’s file is confidential and not subject to disclosure under chapter 44-04 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota, is for the exclusive use and information of the organization or its agents in the discharge of the organization’s official duties, and is not open to the public nor usable in any court in any court action or proceeding unless the organization is a party to that court action or proceeding. The information contained in the file, however, may be tabulated and published by the organization in statistical form for the use and information of the state departments and of the public.

An employer file includes all documents and data pertaining to a person that pays premium to the organization, except for information relating to a grant award under section 65-03-04 which the organization is specifically authorized to disclose or under section 65-03-04 which does not disclose payroll or premium information as provided in subsection 3.

Upon request, the organization shall disclose the rate classification of an employer to the requester; however, the organization may not disclose any information that would reveal the amount of payroll upon which that employer’s premium is being paid or the amount of premium the employer is paying. The organization may disclose whether an employer’s file is active, canceled, closed, pending, delinquent, or uninsured. The information in the employer’s file may not be released in aggregate form, except to those persons contracting with the organization for exchange of information pertaining to the administration of this title, except upon written authorization by the employer for a specified purpose, or at the discretion of the organization with regard to delinquent and uninsured employers. Disclosure by a public servant of information contained in an employer’s report, except as otherwise allowed by law, is a violation of section 12.1-13-01. Anyone who is convicted under section 12.1-13-01 is disqualified from holding any office or employment with the organization.

The organization may, upon request of the state tax commissioner or the secretary of state, furnish to them a list of employers showing only the names, addresses, and organization file identification numbers of such employers as those files relate to this chapter; provided, that any such list so furnished must be used by the tax commissioner or the secretary of state only for the purpose of administering their duties. The organization may provide any state or federal agency information obtained pursuant to the administration of this title. Any information so provided must be used only for the purpose of administering the duties of that state or federal agency.

Whenever the organization obtains information on activities of a contractor doing business in this state of which officials of the secretary of state, job service North Dakota, or tax commissioner may be unaware and that may be relevant to the duties of those officials, the organization shall provide any relevant information to those officials for the purpose of administering their duties.

The organization may provide any state agency or a private entity with a list of names and addresses of employers for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information pursuant to section 54-06-04.3. Any information so provided may only be used for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 5; 1921, ch. 143, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a5; R.C. 1943, § 65-0415; S.L. 1969, ch. 516, § 4; 1973, ch. 503, § 1; 1975, ch. 580, § 1; 1983, ch. 696, § 4; 1985, ch. 686, § 1; 1989, ch. 509, § 4; 1991, ch. 568, § 6; 1991, ch. 714, § 36; 2003, ch. 508, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 4; 2005, ch. 606, § 1; 2007, ch. 569, § 2; 2009, ch. 608, § 5.

65-04-16.
Adjustment of premium paid on estimated payroll.

In the event that the amount of premium collected from any employer at the beginning of any premium period is ascertained and calculated by using as a basis the estimated expenditures for wages for the period of time covered by such premium payments, an adjustment of the amount of such premiums shall be made at the end of said period, and the actual amount of such premium shall be determined from the actual expenditure of wages for said period.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0416.

65-04-17.
Experience rating of employers.

The organization may establish a system for the experience rating of risks of employers contributing to the fund, and such system shall provide for the credit rating and the penalty rating of individual risks within such limitations as the organization may establish from time to time.

In calculating the experience rating, the organization shall determine the minimum rate for each employment classification by multiplying the required average premium rate by twenty-five hundredths to get the minimum rate assigned to an employer with a positive experience rating.

The organization may not amend its experience rating system by emergency rulemaking.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0417; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 7; 1993, ch. 622, § 2; 1995, ch. 617, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2007, ch. 569, § 3.

65-04-17.1.
Retrospective rating program.

The organization may establish a program to provide retrospective rating. The organization may not require an employer to participate in the program, but it may refuse to allow an employer to participate when it determines that refusal is appropriate. The organization shall establish formulas, based on sound actuarial principles, for premium calculation under the program. Sections 65-04-01, 65-04-04, and 65-04-04.2 do not apply to retrospective premiums allowed under this section. Any moneys held by the organization for future claim payments must accrue interest at a reasonable rate as determined by the organization. The organization may execute a contract with an employer to establish a retrospective rating plan for that employer. The contract is binding on the employer and the organization for the term identified in the contract. The term identified in the contract may extend past the end of the biennium in which the contract is executed but the term may not exceed ten years. The organization shall determine the amount of the deposit premium to be paid by an employer participating in the program. The amount of the deposit premium must be based on current rates, payroll, and experience rate factors. The organization shall establish the maximum premium liability of a participating employer. The maximum premium is not subject to the limitations of section 65-04-17. The organization may provide refunds from the workforce safety and insurance fund when it is determined appropriate under the retrospective rating formula established. The organization shall provide any refund due within thirty days after the date of the retrospective premium valuation. The organization may impose a penalty if an employer fails to pay additional premium due within thirty days after the retrospective premium valuation. The organization may require an employer to provide a bond, letter of credit, or other security approved by the organization to guarantee payment of future employer obligations incurred by a retrospective rating plan. The organization may charge an employer participating in the program a nonrefundable surcharge for the purpose of assisting retirement of any unfunded liability of the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 620, § 1; 1999, ch. 555, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-18.
Subsequent injury or aggravation of previous injury or condition of employee — Charge to employer’s risk — Charge of part of claim to subsequent injury fund.

Whenever a subsequent injury or aggravation of a previous injury or pre-existing condition occurs to an employee, the risk of the employer for whom such person was working at the time of such subsequent injury or aggravation shall be charged only with the amount of the awards resulting from such subsequent injury or aggravation. Whenever such subsequent injury or aggravation results in further disability or an aggravation of a pre-existing injury or condition, the compensation which is in excess of the amount to which the injured employee would have been entitled solely by reason of the subsequent injury or aggravation shall be charged to the subsequent injury fund and not to the classification or the risk to which the subsequent injury or aggravation is charged.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 7; 1923, ch. 347, § 1; 1925, ch. 221, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0418; S.L. 1947, ch. 375, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 65-0418; S.L. 1969, ch. 561, § 1.

65-04-19.
Organization to assign rate classifications, calculate premium, and determine premium due from employer — Audit — Notification of billing statement as notice of amount due.

The organization shall assign rate classifications based on information provided to the organization by the employer or information gathered through the organization’s investigative process.

The organization shall determine the amount of premium due from every employer subject to this title for the twelve months next succeeding the date of expiration of a previous period of insurance or next succeeding the date at which the organization received information an employer is subject to the title.

If the organization does not receive the payroll report or, in the case of a noncompliant employer, the organization does not receive reliable and accurate payroll information, the organization may calculate premium using the wage cap in effect per employee reported in the previous payroll report, using information obtained through the organization’s investigative process, or using data obtained from job service North Dakota.

The organization may audit an employer conducting business in this state. Audit findings are applicable to the audited period and the subsequent payroll period only, unless the audit referral is made for a potential violation of section 65-04-33.

The organization shall send a copy of the billing statement to the employer. Sending the billing statement, by mail or electronically, constitutes notice to the employer of the amount due.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0419; S.L. 1983, ch. 696, § 5; 1995, ch. 619, § 4; 2001, ch. 578, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 438, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 503, § 3, effective March 15, 2021.

Partial Payment.

Where partial payments are made on judgment against an employer for recovery of premium due, employees are entitled to participate in fund from date fixed by pay-in-order and for such portion of year thereafter as amount paid bears proportionately to annual premium. LIGHT v. NORTH DAKOTA WORKMEN'S COMPENSATION BUR., 57 N.D. 487, 222 N.W. 952, 1929 N.D. LEXIS 342 (N.D. 1929).

65-04-19.1.
Premium discount for implementation of risk management programs.

Any employer who achieves the benchmarks outlined by the organization’s risk management programs is eligible for a discount in the annual premium for the year following the year in which the risk management program’s benchmarks are achieved.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 624, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 604, § 3; 2007, ch. 569, § 4.

65-04-19.2.
State agency participation in risk management program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 564, § 14.

65-04-19.3.
Premium calculation programs — Authority.

The organization may create and implement actuarially sound employer premium calculation programs, including dividends, group insurance, premium deductibles, and reimbursement for medical expense assessments. Programs created or modified under this section are not subject to title 28-32 and may include requirements or incentives for the early reporting of injuries. An employer with a deductible policy under this section, who chooses to pursue a third-party action under section 65-01-09 after an injured worker and the organization have chosen not to pursue the third-party action, may keep one hundred percent of the recovery obtained, regardless of the expense incurred in covering the injury and regardless of any contrary provision in section 65-01-09. If the employer pursues the third-party action pursuant to this section, neither the organization nor the injured worker has any liability for sharing in the expense of bringing that action.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 555, § 3; 2001, ch. 579, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 604, § 4; 2009, ch. 611, § 9.

65-04-20.
Installment payment of premiums — Interest required.

An employer, subject to section 65-04-22, may pay the annual premium in installments.

Interest must be charged at the prevailing base rate posted by the Bank of North Dakota plus two and one-half percent. The interest charged must be at least six percent per annum. Interest must be charged on all premiums deferred under this section. Upon default in payment of any installment, the penalties apply which are provided in sections 65-04-22 and 65-04-33.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0420; S.L. 1983, ch. 697, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 37; 1995, ch. 621, § 1; 2001, ch. 578, § 5; 2005, ch. 607, § 1; 2013, ch. 502, § 1.

65-04-21.
Utilization of public funds for payment of premiums due the fund.

The state of North Dakota or any municipality thereof, whenever necessary, may use any funds of the state or municipality, as the case may be, except such funds as are raised by special levies, for the payment of premiums due the fund for insurance upon employees of such state or municipality. If there are no funds on hand with which the premium payments may be made, the state or a municipality thereof may issue special warrants against its general fund for the payment of such premiums, and such warrants shall be paid in their order the same as any other warrants of the state or municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 288, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 65-0421.

65-04-22.
Organization may make premium due immediately — When premium is in default — Penalty.

The organization may require a security deposit, or other instrument that is acceptable to the organization, within any time which, in the judgment of the organization, is reasonable and necessary. The organization may require advance payment of the premium, either in full or in installments. Any payment shall be in default one month from the payment due date specified in the billing statement.

Default of any installment payment will, at the option of the organization, make the entire remaining balance of the premium due and payable. The organization may declare an employer uninsured at any time after forty-five days have passed from the due date specified in the billing statement and the employer has failed to make a payment to the organization. The organization may decline coverage to any employer that has been determined to be uninsured under this section or where a premium delinquency remains unresolved.

When an employer defaults in the payment of a premium, an installment of the premium, penalty or interest, or in the filing of any bond required under this chapter, the employer at the time of default is subject to a penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars plus two percent of the amount of premiums, penalties, and interest in default, and beginning one month after default, a penalty of two percent of the amount of premiums, penalties, and interest in default for each month or fraction of a month the premium, penalty, or interest remains unpaid.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; 1939, ch. 251, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 65-0422; S.L. 1975, ch. 581, § 5; 1983, ch. 697, § 2; 2001, ch. 578, § 6; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 607, § 2; 2013, ch. 502, § 2; 2015, ch. 484, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 437, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 524, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

65-04-22.1.
Retroactive payment not required.

When the organization reviews a potential employment relationship involving an independent contractor who has a valid identification number issued under section 34-05-01.4 and determines that the party described as an independent contractor is an employee for purposes of workforce safety and insurance premiums, rather than an independent contractor, the organization may not require the party determined to be the employer to pay premiums for that employee, or any interest, penalty, or delinquency fee with respect to those premiums, retroactive to the date the relationship with the employee began, unless, however, the organization determines that the employer willfully and intentionally entered the relationship with the purpose of avoiding workforce safety and insurance premium payments. The organization may require the payment of premiums for that employee as of the date the order declaring an employment relationship becomes final.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 347, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-04-23.
Penalties for default in payment of premiums, penalties, and interest. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 17.

65-04-24.
Notice of premium or assessment owing — Organization to bring suit for premiums in default.

The organization shall notify an employer of the amount of premium, assessment, penalty, and interest due the organization from the employer. If the employer fails to pay that amount within thirty days, the organization may collect the premium, assessment, penalties, and interest due by civil action. In any action for the collection of amounts due the organization under this title, the court may not review or consider the action of the organization regarding the acceptance or payment of any claim. The organization may adjust or compromise the account. The organization may retain counsel on a contingent or hourly fee basis to represent the organization in any proceeding relating to the collection of amounts due under this title. The organization shall charge attorney’s fees and costs to the organization’s general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 8; 1921, ch. 144, § 1; 1923, ch. 349, § 1; 1925, ch. 226, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a8; S.L. 1931, ch. 315, § 1; 1943, ch. 274, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 65-0424; S.L. 1975, ch. 581, § 7; 1995, ch. 619, § 6; 2001, ch. 578, § 7; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2019, ch. 524, § 8, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 503, § 4, effective March 15, 2021.